West Virginia, session 2026, HB4660.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS. §18-3-11. Classification of schools. (a) The state superintendent shall classify all elementary and secondary schools on the basis of standards, rules and regulations established by the state board after publishing such standards, rules and regulations, and forwarding them to the district boards of education, county superintendents, and other school officers.(b) Effective for the school year beginning 2026/2027, all sixth-grade students shall be reclassified and moved from elementary school to middle school. Any reclassification of teachers shall be done in accordance with §18A-4-1 of this code.